Massachusetts, session 194th, H2654.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20O of chapter 233 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the definition of “Crisis intervention” and
inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
“Crisis intervention”, immediate short-term psychological care provided by a certified
emergency service provider providing critical incident stress management to an individual or
group of emergency service providers after their response to a critical incident.
SECTION 2. Said section 20O of chapter 233 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “referral” in line 12 the following words:- provided to an individual or group of emergency
service providers
SECTION 3. Said section 20O of chapter 233 is hereby amended by striking the
definition of “Critical incident stress management” and inserting in place thereof the following
definition:-
of 2

“Critical incident stress management”, a program designed to assist an individual or
group of emergency service providers in coping with the psychological stress or trauma resulting
from their response to a critical incident.
SECTION 4. Said section 20O of chapter 233 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “firefighter” in line 22 the following words:- corrections officer, police dispatcher, 911
operator
SECTION 5. Subsection (b) of said section 20O of chapter 233 is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “as part of” in lines 27 and 34 respectively the following words:- a
group or individual
SECTION 6. Said subsection (b) of chapter 329 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “provider” in line 30 the following words:- , emergency service provider
of 2